California statutes. Education Code
(a) An individualized education program required as a result of an assessment of a pupil shall be developed within a total time not to exceed 60 days, not counting days between the pupil’s regular school sessions, terms, or days of school vacation in excess of five schooldays, from the date of receipt of the parent’s written consent for assessment, unless the parent agrees, in writing, to an extension. However, an individualized education program required as a result of an assessment of a pupil shall be developed within 30 days after the commencement of the subsequent regular school year as determined by each local educational agency’s school calendar for each pupil for whom a referral has been made 30 days or less prior to the end of the regular school year. In the case of pupil school vacations, the 60-day time shall recommence on the date that pupil schooldays reconvene. A meeting to develop an initial individualized education program for the pupil shall be conducted within 30 days of a determination that the pupil needs special education and related services pursuant to Section 300.323(c)(1) of Title 34 of the Code of Federal Regulations.

(b) Pursuant to Section 300.323(c)(2) of Title 34 of the Code of Federal Regulations, as soon as possible following development of the individualized education program, special education and related services shall be made available to the individual with exceptional needs in accordance with the individual’s individualized education program.

(c) Each local educational agency shall have an individualized education program in effect for each individual with exceptional needs within its jurisdiction at the beginning of each school year in accordance with subdivision (a) and pursuant to Section 300.323(a) and (b) of Title 34 of the Code of Federal Regulations.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2007, Ch. 454, Sec. 19.   Effective October 10, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

56345.

(a) The individualized education program is a written statement for each individual with exceptional needs that is developed, reviewed, and revised in accordance with this section, as required by Section 1414(d) of Title 20 of the United States Code, and that includes all of the following:

(1) A statement of the individual’s present levels of academic achievement and functional performance, including all of the following:

(A) The manner in which the disability of the individual affects their involvement and progress in the general education curriculum.

(B) For preschool children, as appropriate, the manner in which the disability affects their participation in appropriate activities.

(C) For individuals with exceptional needs who take alternate assessments aligned to alternate achievement standards, a description of benchmarks or short-term objectives.

(2) A statement of measurable annual goals, including academic and functional goals, designed to do both of the following:

(A) Meet the needs of the individual that result from the disability of the individual to enable the pupil to be involved in and make progress in the general education curriculum.

(B) Meet each of the other educational needs of the pupil that result
 from the disability of the individual.

(3) A description of the manner in which the progress of the pupil toward meeting the annual goals described in paragraph (2) will be measured and when periodic reports on the progress the pupil is making toward meeting the annual goals, such as through the use of quarterly or other periodic reports, concurrent with the issuance of report cards, will be provided.

(4) A statement of the special education and related services and supplementary aids and services, based on peer-reviewed research to the extent practicable, to be provided to the pupil, or on behalf of the pupil, and a statement of the program modifications or supports for school personnel that will be provided to enable the pupil to do all of the following:

(A) To advance appropriately toward attaining the annual goals.

(B) To be involved in and make progress in the general education curriculum in accordance with paragraph (1) and to participate in extracurricular and other nonacademic activities.

(C) To be educated and participate with other individuals with exceptional needs and nondisabled pupils in the activities described in this subdivision.

(5) An explanation of the extent, if any, to which the pupil will not participate with nondisabled pupils in the regular class and in the activities described in subparagraph (C) of paragraph (4).

(6) (A) A statement of individual appropriate accommodations that are necessary to measure the academic achievement and functional performance of the pupil on state and districtwide assessments consistent with Section 1412(a)(16)(A) of Title 20 of the United States Code.

(B) If the individualized education program team determines that the pupil shall take an alternate assessment instead of a particular state or districtwide assessment of pupil achievement, a statement of both of the following:

(i) The reason why the pupil cannot participate in the regular assessment.

(ii) The reason why the particular alternate assessment selected is appropriate for the pupil.

(7) The projected date for the beginning of the services and modifications described in paragraph (4), and the anticipated frequency, location, and duration of those services and modifications.

(8) Pursuant to Section 1414(d)(1)(A)(i)(VIII) of Title 20 of the United States Code and Section 56345.1, if determined appropriate by the pupil’s individualized education program team, beginning when the pupil
 starts their high school experience or not later than the first individualized education program to be in effect when the pupil is 16 years of age or younger, as appropriate, and updated annually thereafter, both of the following shall be included:

(A) Appropriate measurable postsecondary goals based upon
 age-appropriate transition assessments related to training, education, employment, and where appropriate, independent living skills.

(B) The transition services, as defined in Section 56345.1, including courses of study, needed to assist the pupil in reaching those goals.

(9) (A) A description of the means by which the individualized education program will be provided under emergency conditions, as described in Section 46392, in which instruction or services, or both, cannot be provided to the pupil either at the school or in person for more than 10 schooldays. The description shall include all of the following:

(i) Special education and related services.

(ii) Supplementary aids and services.

(iii) Transition services, as defined in Section 56345.1.

(iv) Extended school year services pursuant to Section 300.106 of Title 34 of the Code of Federal Regulations.

(B) Subparagraph (A) applies, on or after the operative date of this paragraph, to the development of an initial individualized education program or the next regularly scheduled revision of an individualized education program that has not already met the requirements of subparagraph (A).

(C) Public health orders shall be taken into account in implementing subparagraph (A).

(b) If appropriate, the individualized education program shall also include, but not be limited to, all of the following:

(1) For pupils in grades 7 to 12, inclusive, any alternative means and modes necessary for the pupil to complete the prescribed course of study of the district and to meet or exceed proficiency standards for graduation.

(2) For individuals whose native language is a language other than English, linguistically appropriate goals, objectives, programs, and services.

(3) Pursuant to Section 300.106 of Title 34 of the Code of Federal Regulations, extended school year services shall be included in the individualized education program and provided to the
 pupil if the individualized education program team of the pupil determines, on an individual basis, that the services are necessary for the provision of a free appropriate public education to the pupil.

(4) Provision for the transition into the regular class program if the pupil is to be transferred from a special class or nonpublic, nonsectarian school into a regular class in a public school for any part of the schoolday, including both of the following:

(A) A description of activities provided to integrate the pupil into the regular education program. The description shall indicate the nature of each activity, and the time spent on the activity each day or week.

(B) A description of the activities provided to support the transition
 of pupils from the special education program into the regular education program.

(5) For pupils with low-incidence disabilities, specialized services, materials, and equipment, consistent with guidelines established pursuant to Section 56136.

(c) It is the intent of the Legislature in requiring individualized education programs, that the local educational agency is responsible for providing the services delineated in the individualized education program. However, the Legislature recognizes that some pupils may not meet or exceed the growth projected in the annual goals and objectives of the individualized education program of the pupil.

(d) Consistent with Section 56000.5 and Section 1414(d)(3)(B)(iv) of Title
 20 of the United States Code, it is the intent of the Legislature that, in making a determination of the services that constitute an appropriate education to meet the unique needs of a deaf or hard-of-hearing pupil in the least restrictive environment, the individualized education program team shall consider the related services and program options that provide the pupil with an equal opportunity for communication access. The individualized education program team shall specifically discuss the communication needs of the pupil, consistent with “Deaf Students Education Services Policy Guidance” (57 Fed. Reg. 49274 (October 1992)), including all of the following:

(1) The pupil’s primary language mode and language, which may include the use of spoken language with or without visual cues, or the use of sign language, or a combination of both.

(2) The availability of a sufficient number of age, cognitive, and language peers of similar abilities, which may be met by consolidating services into a local plan areawide program or providing placement pursuant to Section 56361.

(3) Appropriate, direct, and ongoing language access to special education teachers and other specialists who are proficient in the pupil’s primary language mode and language consistent with existing law regarding teacher training requirements.

(4) Services necessary to ensure communication-accessible academic instructions, school services, and extracurricular activities consistent with the federal Rehabilitation Act of 1973 (29 U.S.C. Sec. 701 et seq.) and the federal Americans with Disabilities
 Act of 1990 (42 U.S.C. Sec. 12101 et seq.).

(5) In accordance with Section 300.113 of Title 34 of the Code of Federal Regulations, each public agency shall ensure that hearing aids worn in school by children with hearing impairments, including deafness, are functioning properly.

(6) Subject to paragraph (7), each public agency, pursuant to
 Section 300.113(b) of Title 34 of the Code of Federal Regulations, shall ensure that external components of surgically implanted medical devices are functioning properly.

(7) For a child with a surgically implanted medical device who is receiving special education and a service under Section 56363, a public agency is not responsible for the postsurgical maintenance, programming, or replacement of the medical device that has been surgically implanted, or of an external component of the surgically implanted medical device.

(e) State moneys appropriated to districts or local educational agencies may not be used for any additional responsibilities and services associated with paragraphs (1) and (2) of subdivision (d), including the training of special education teachers and
 other specialists, even if those additional responsibilities or services are required pursuant to a judicial or state agency determination. Those responsibilities and services shall only be funded by a local educational agency as follows:

(1) The costs of those activities shall be funded from existing programs and funding sources.

(2) Those activities shall be supported by the resources otherwise made available to those programs.

(3) Those activities shall be consistent with Sections 56240 to 56243, inclusive.

(f) It is the intent of the Legislature that the communication skills of teachers who work with hard-of-hearing and deaf children be improved.
 This section does not remove the discretionary authority of the local educational agency in regard to inservice activities.

(g) Beginning not later than one year before the pupil reaches 18 years of age, a statement that the pupil has been informed of the pupil’s rights under this part, if any, that will transfer to the pupil upon reaching 18 years of age pursuant to Section 56041.5.

(h) The individualized education program team is not required to include information under one component of a pupil’s individualized education program that is already contained under another component of the individualized education program.

(i) This section does not require that additional information, beyond that explicitly required by
 Section 1414 of Title 20 of the United States Code and this part, be included in the individualized education program of a pupil.

(j) This section shall become operative on July 1, 2025.

(History: Repealed (in Sec. 5) and added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 901, Sec. 6.   (AB 438)   Effective January 1, 2025.   Operative July 1, 2025, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

56345.1.

(a) The term “transition services,” as defined in Section 1401(34) of Title 20 of the United States Code and as used in subparagraph (B) of paragraph (8) of subdivision (a) of Section 56345, means a coordinated set of activities for an individual with exceptional needs that does all of the following:

(1) Is designed within an results-oriented process, that is focused on improving the academic and functional achievement of the individual with exceptional needs to facilitate the movement of the pupil from school to postschool activities, including postsecondary education, vocational education, integrated employment, including supported employment, continuing and adult education, adult services, independent living, or community participation.

(2) Is based upon the individual needs of the pupil, taking into account the strengths, preferences, and interests of the pupil.

(3) Includes instruction, related services, community experiences, the development of employment and other postschool adult living objectives, and, if appropriate, acquisition of daily living skills and provision of a functional vocational evaluation.

(b) In accordance with Section 300.43(b) of Title 34 of the Code of Federal Regulations, transition services for individuals with exceptional needs may be special education, if provided as specially designed instruction, or a designated instruction and service, if required to assist a pupil to benefit from special education.

(c) If a participating agency, other than the local educational agency, fails to provide the transition services described in the individualized education program of the pupil in accordance with Section 1414(d)(6) of Title 20 of the United States Code and paragraph (8) of subdivision (a) of Section 56345, the local educational agency shall reconvene the individualized education program team to identify alternative strategies to meet the transition service needs for the pupil set out in the program.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2007, Ch. 454, Sec. 21.   Effective October 10, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

56345.2.

(a) Pursuant to Section 300.107 of Title 34 of the Code of Federal Regulations, each public agency shall take steps, including the provision of supplementary aids and services determined appropriate and necessary by the individualized education program team of the individual with exceptional needs, to provide nonacademic and extracurricular services and activities in the manner necessary to afford individuals with exceptional needs an equal opportunity for participation in those services and activities.

(b) Nonacademic and extracurricular services and activities may include counseling services, athletics, transportation, health services, recreational activities, special interest groups or clubs sponsored by the public agency, referrals to agencies that provide assistance to individuals with exceptional needs, and employment of pupils, including both employment by the public agency and assistance in making outside employment available.

(c) Pursuant to Section 300.117 of Title 34 of the Code of Federal Regulations, each public agency shall ensure that each individual with exceptional needs participates with nondisabled children in extracurricular services and activities to the maximum extent appropriate to the needs of that individual. Each public agency shall ensure that each individual with exceptional needs has the supplementary aids and services determined by the individualized education program team of the individual to be appropriate and necessary for the individual to participate in nonacademic settings.

(History: Added by Stats. 2007, Ch. 454, Sec. 22.   Effective October 10, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

56345.5.

Except as prescribed in subdivision (b) of Section 56324, nothing in this part shall be construed to authorize local educational agencies to prescribe health care services.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2007, Ch. 56, Sec. 50.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------

56346.

(a) A public agency, as defined in Section 56028.5, that is responsible for making a free appropriate public education and related services to the child with a disability under this part shall seek to obtain informed consent from the parent of the child before providing special education and related services to the child pursuant to Section 1414(a)(1)(D)(i)(II) of Title 20 of the United States Code. The public agency shall make reasonable efforts to obtain informed consent from the parent for the initial provision of special education and related services to the child in accordance with Section 300.300(b)(2) of Title 34 of the Code of
 Federal Regulations.

(b) If the parent of the child fails to respond or refuses to consent to the initiation of services pursuant to subdivision (a), the public agency shall not provide special education and related services to the child by utilizing the procedures in Section 1415 of Title 20 of the United States Code or the procedures in subdivision (e) of Section 56506 in order to obtain agreement or a ruling that the services may be provided to the child.

(c) If the parent of the child refuses to consent to the initial provision of special education and related services, or the parent fails to respond to a request to provide the consent, both of the following are applicable:

(1) The public agency shall not be considered to be in violation of the requirement to make available a free appropriate public education to
 the child for the failure to provide the child with the special education and related services for which the public agency requests consent.

(2) The public agency shall not be required to convene an individualized education program team meeting or develop an individualized education program under this part for the child for the special education and related services for which the public agency requests consent.

(d) (1) Pursuant to Section 300.300(b)(4) of Title 34 of the Code of Federal Regulations, if the parent or guardian of a child submits a written revocation of his or her consent pursuant to this section at any time subsequent to the initial provision of special education and related services to the child, the public agency shall not do either of the following:

(A) Continue to provide
 special education and related services to the child, but shall provide prior written notice to the child’s parent or guardian in accordance with Section 56500.4 before ceasing the provision of the special education and related services.

(B) Use the procedural safeguards specified in Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 56500), including mediation and the due process complaint procedures, to obtain agreement or a ruling that the services may be provided to the child.

(2) A public agency shall be deemed in compliance with the requirement to make a free appropriate public education available to a child if the agency ceases to provide the child with further special education and related services pursuant to this subdivision. A public agency is not required to convene an individualized education program team meeting or develop an individualized education program pursuant to this article
 for the child for further provision of special education and related services.

(e) If the parent of the child consents in writing to the receipt of special education and related services for the child but does not consent to all of the components of the individualized education program, those components of the program to which the parent has consented shall be implemented so as not to delay providing instruction and services to the child.

(f) With the exception of a parent of a child who fails to respond pursuant to subdivision (b), or refuses to consent to services pursuant to subdivision (b), if the public agency determines that the proposed special education program component to which the parent does not consent is necessary to provide a free appropriate public education to the child, a due process hearing shall be initiated in accordance with Section 1415(f) of Title 20 of the
 United States Code. If a due process hearing is held, the hearing decision shall be the final administrative determination and shall be binding upon the parties. While a resolution session, mediation conference, or due process hearing is pending, the child shall remain in his or her current placement, unless the parent and the public agency agree otherwise.

(g) In accordance with Section 300.300(d)(4)(i) of Title 34 of the Code of Federal Regulations, if the parent of a child who is home schooled or placed in a private school by the parents at their own expense does not provide consent for the initial assessment or the reassessment, or the parent fails to respond to a request to provide consent, the public agency shall not use the consent override procedures described in Section 300.300(a)(3) and (c)(1) of Title 34 of the Code of Federal Regulations. The public agency is not required to consider the child as eligible for services under Article
 5.6 (commencing with Section 56170) of Chapter 2.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2010, Ch. 243, Sec. 2.   (AB 1841)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

56347.

A local educational agency, prior to the placement of the individual with exceptional needs, shall ensure that the regular teacher or teachers, the special education teacher or teachers, and other persons who provide special education, related services, or both to the individual with exceptional needs have access to the pupil’s individualized education program, shall be knowledgeable of the content of the individualized education program, and shall be informed of his or her specific responsibilities related to implementing a pupil’s individualized education program and the specific accommodations, modifications and supports that shall be provided for the pupil in accordance with the individualized education program, pursuant to Section 300.323(d) of Title 34 of the Code of Federal Regulations. A copy of each individualized education program shall be maintained at each schoolsite where the pupil is enrolled. Service providers from other agencies who provide instruction or a related service to the individual off the schoolsite shall be provided a copy of the individualized education program. All individualized education programs shall be maintained in accordance with state and federal pupil record confidentiality laws.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2007, Ch. 56, Sec. 51.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------

56348.

By January 1, 2027, or no later than 18 months after the final draft of the state standardized individualized education program (IEP) template developed by the California Collaborative for Educational Excellence is converted to a digital platform, whichever date comes first, the department shall do both of the following:

(a) Translate the
 IEP template into the top 10 most commonly spoken languages used across the state other than English and make those templates available on the department’s internet website.

(b) Notify school districts, county offices of education, charter schools, and other relevant stakeholders that the IEP template, including all translated templates, is available on the department’s internet website and via other methods of dissemination upon request.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 906, Sec. 1.   (SB 445)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3.5. Individualized Education Program for Visually Impaired Pupils [56350. - 56354.]

56350.

Unless the context otherwise requires, the definitions set forth in this section shall govern the construction of this article.

(a) A “functionally blind pupil” means a pupil who relies basically on senses other than vision as major channels for learning.

(b) A “pupil with low vision” means a pupil who uses vision as a channel for learning, but who may also benefit from instruction in braille.

(c) A “visually impaired pupil” means a pupil who is functionally blind or a pupil with low vision. For purposes of this article, a “visually impaired pupil” does not
 include a pupil who is eligible for special education and related services based on a specific learning disability identified pursuant to Section 56338.

(d) (1) “Braille” means the system of reading and writing through touch commonly known as Unified English Braille.

(2) Nothing in paragraph (1) shall be construed to prohibit the use of Nemeth Code for Mathematics and Science Notation in the teaching of mathematics and science, the use of Music Braille Code, or the use of International Phonetic Alphabet Braille Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 85, Sec. 1.   (AB 3223)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

56351.

Local educational agencies shall provide opportunities for braille instruction for pupils who, due to a prognosis of visual deterioration, may be expected to have a need for braille as a reading medium.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2007, Ch. 56, Sec. 52.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------

56351.5.

(a) (1) A local educational agency may reinforce braille instruction using a braille instructional aide who meets the criteria set forth in paragraph (2) under the supervision of a teacher who holds an appropriate credential, as determined by the Commission on Teacher Credentialing, to teach pupils who are functionally blind or visually impaired. This instruction shall be in accordance with the individualized education program of the pupil.

(2) For purposes of this section, a braille instructional aide shall demonstrate to the supervising teacher that the aide is fluent in reading and writing grade 2 braille and possesses basic knowledge of the rules of braille construction.

(b) A local educational agency that employs a braille instructional aide shall provide the aide with information regarding teaching credential programs, including the California Classified School Employee Teacher Credentialing Program (Article 12 (commencing with Section 44391) of Chapter 2 of Part 25 of Division 3) and the Teacher Education Internship Act of 1967 (Article 3 (commencing with Section 44450) of Chapter 3 of Part 25 of Division 3).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 15, Sec. 1.   (AB 497)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

56351.7.

(a) The Superintendent of Public Instruction shall form an advisory task force to develop standards for the mastery of the braille code as a child progresses through kindergarten to grade 12, inclusive.

(b) The task force shall include, but shall not be limited to, members approved by the State Board of Education representing all of the following:

(1) Parents of visually impaired pupils.

(2) Teachers of visually impaired pupils.

(3) Researchers in the field of visual impairment.

(4) Braille experts.

(5) Groups that advocate for teaching of, and use of, braille.

(6) Groups that advocate for the visually impaired.

(c) The task force shall report to the Governor and to the education committees of the Assembly and the Senate by June 30, 2004.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 653, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

56351.8.

(a) The Superintendent shall utilize the advisory task force established pursuant to Section 56351.7 to develop standards for pupils described in subdivision (b) to learn, and to achieve mastery of, the braille mathematics code as they progress through kindergarten and grades 1 to 12, inclusive.

(b) The standards described in subdivision (a) shall be developed for pupils who, due to a visual impairment, are functionally blind or may be expected to have a need to learn the braille code as their primary literacy mode for learning.

(c) The task force shall, by March 1, 2006, report to the state board with the standards it develops pursuant to subdivision (a).

(History: Added by Stats. 2005, Ch. 530, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------

56351.9.

(a) By June 1, 2006, the state board shall adopt braille reading and mathematics standards for pupils who, due to a visual impairment, are functionally blind or may be expected to have a need to learn the braille code as their primary literacy mode for learning.

(b) County offices of education, school districts, and special education local plan areas shall provide to pupils described in subdivision (a) opportunities for instruction to master the braille reading and mathematics standards described in subdivision (a).

(History: Added by Stats. 2005, Ch. 530, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------

56352.

(a) A functional vision assessment conducted pursuant to Section 56320 shall be used as one criterion in determining the appropriate reading medium or media for the pupil.

(b) An assessment of braille skills shall be required for functionally blind pupils who have the ability to read in accordance with guidelines established pursuant to Section 56136. A local educational agency may provide pupils with low vision with the opportunity to receive assessments to determine the appropriate reading medium or media, including braille instruction, for the pupils.

(c) The determination, by a pupil’s individualized education program team, of the most appropriate medium or media, including braille, for functionally blind pupils who have the ability to read shall use as one criterion the assessment provided for pursuant to subdivision (b) and shall be in accordance with guidelines established pursuant to Section 56136.

(d) Except as provided in subdivision (b) of Section 56351.5, braille instruction shall be provided by a teacher who holds an appropriate credential, as determined by the Commission on Teacher Credentialing, to teach pupils who are functionally blind or visually impaired.

(e) Each visually impaired pupil shall be provided with the opportunity to receive an assessment to determine the appropriate reading medium or media, including braille instruction, if appropriate, for that pupil.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2007, Ch. 56, Sec. 54.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------

56353.

(a) The Legislature finds and declares that the expanded core curriculum is a set of knowledge and skills in which instruction or services, or both, may be beneficial to a pupil who is blind, has low vision, or is visually
 impaired. Local educational agencies may consider the expanded core curriculum when developing individualized education programs for a pupil who is blind, has low vision, or is visually impaired.

(b) The expanded core curriculum is defined to be all of the following:

(1) Compensatory skills, such as braille and concept development and other skills needed to access the core curriculum.

(2) Orientation and mobility.

(3) Social interaction skills.

(4) Career technical education.

(5) Assistive technology, including optical devices.

(6) Independent living skills.

(7) Recreation and leisure.

(8) Self-determination.

(9) Sensory efficiency.

(c) When appropriate to ensure that a pupil will receive adequate services under this section, those services may be provided
 before or after school hours.

(d) For purposes of this section, “local educational agency” means a school district, county office of education, or charter school.

(History: Added by Stats. 2019, Ch. 778, Sec. 2.   (AB 947)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

56354.

(a) (1) If an orientation
 and mobility evaluation is determined to be needed for a pupil who is blind, has low vision, or is visually impaired, it shall be conducted by a person who is appropriately certified as an orientation and mobility specialist.

(2) The orientation and mobility evaluations described in paragraph (1) shall occur in
 familiar and unfamiliar environments, in varying lighting conditions, and in the home, school, and community, as appropriate.

(b) Except as specified in subdivision (c), a local educational agency shall not impose any limitations that result in the preclusion or the limitation of the ability of a pupil to receive instruction in orientation and mobility services in the home, school, or community setting and in varying lighting conditions, as designated in the pupil’s individualized education program and provided for pursuant to the federal Individuals with Disabilities Education Act (20 U.S.C. Sec. 1400
 et seq.).

(c) (1) A local educational agency may require annual written parental consent to provide the services described in subdivision (b) when those services are provided before or after regular school hours and when those services are provided away from the schoolsite.

(2) If a local educational agency
 prohibits an orientation and mobility specialist from using their vehicles for the transportation of pupils to and from orientation and mobility instruction, the local educational agency shall provide, without cost to the orientation and mobility specialist, an equally effective transportation alternative for that purpose.

(d) For purposes of this section, “local educational agency” means a school district, county office of education, or charter school.

(History: Added by Stats. 2019, Ch. 778, Sec. 3.   (AB 947)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Implementation [56360. - 56369.]

56360.

Each special education local plan area shall ensure that a continuum of program options is available to meet the needs of individuals with exceptional needs for special education and related services, as required by the Individuals with Disabilities Education Act (20 U.S.C. Sec. 1400 et seq.) and federal regulations relating thereto.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1997, Ch. 854, Sec. 29.   Effective January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

56361.

The continuum of program options shall include, but not necessarily be limited to, all of the following or any combination of the following:

(a) Regular education programs consistent with subparagraph (A) of paragraph (5) of subsection (a) of Section 1412 of Title 20 of the United States Code and implementing regulations.

(b) A resource specialist program pursuant to Section 56362.

(c) Designated instruction and services pursuant to Section 56363.

(d) Special classes pursuant to Section 56364.2.

(e) Nonpublic, nonsectarian school services pursuant to Section 56365.

(f) State special schools pursuant to Section 56367.

(g) Instruction in settings other than classrooms where specially designed instruction may occur.

(h) Itinerant instruction in classrooms, resource rooms, and settings other than classrooms where specially designed instruction may occur to the extent required by federal law or regulation.

(i) Instruction using telecommunication, and instruction in the home, in hospitals, and in
 other institutions to the extent required by federal law or regulation.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2004, Ch. 896, Sec. 59.   Effective September 29, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

56361.2.

All special education and related services for any individual with exceptional needs who is younger than three years of age shall be provided pursuant to Chapter 4.4 (commencing with Section 56425).

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 1296, Sec. 5.5.   Operative July 1, 1987, by Sec. 25 of Ch. 1296.)
-------------------------------------------

56361.5.

(a) In addition to the continuum of program options listed in Section 56361, a local educational agency may contract with a hospital to provide designated instruction and services, as defined in subdivision (b) of Section 56363, required by the individual with exceptional needs, as specified in the individualized education program. However, a local educational agency shall not contract with a sectarian hospital for instructional services. A local educational agency shall contract with a hospital for designated instruction and services
 required by the individual with exceptional needs only when no appropriate public education program is available.

For purposes of this section, “hospital” means a health care facility licensed by the State Department of Health Care Services.

(b) Contracts with hospitals pursuant to subdivision (a) shall be subject to the procedures prescribed in Sections 56365, 56366, and 56366.5.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2007, Ch. 56, Sec. 55.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------

56362.

(a) The resource specialist program shall provide, but not be limited to, all of the following:

(1) Provision for a resource specialist or specialists who shall provide instruction and services for those pupils whose needs have been identified in an individualized education program developed by the individualized education program team and who are assigned to regular classroom teachers for a majority of a schoolday.

(2) Provision of information and assistance to individuals with exceptional needs and their parents.

(3) Provision of consultation, resource information, and
 material regarding individuals with exceptional needs to their parents and to regular staff members.

(4) Coordination of special education services with the regular school programs for each individual with exceptional needs enrolled in the resource specialist program.

(5) Monitoring of pupil progress on a regular basis, participation in the review and revision of individualized education programs, as appropriate, and referral of pupils who do not demonstrate appropriate progress to the individualized education program team.

(6) Emphasis at the secondary school level on academic achievement, career and vocational development, and preparation for adult life.
